Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 13.2. Private Operation of Juvenile Detention Facilities.

§ 16.1-322.5.
State Board may authorize private construction, operation, etc., of local or regional detention homes, etc.

The State Board of Juvenile Justice may authorize a county or city or any combination of counties, cities, or towns established pursuant to §

16.1-315

to contract with a private entity for the financing, site selection, acquisition, construction, maintenance, leasing, management or operation of a local or regional detention home or other secure facility, or any combination of those services. Any project authorized pursuant to this article shall be consistent with the statewide plan developed pursuant to §

16.1-309.4

.

Any project the State Board authorizes pursuant to subsection A of this section shall be subject to the provisions of the Virginia Public Procurement Act (§

2.2-4300

et seq.) and subject to the requirements and limitations set out below.

Contracts entered into under the terms of this article shall be with an entity submitting an acceptable response pursuant to a request for proposals. An acceptable response shall be one which meets all the requirements in the request for proposals. However, no such contract may be entered into unless the private contractor demonstrates that it has:

The qualifications, experience and management personnel necessary to carry out the terms of this contract;

The financial resources to provide indemnification for liability arising from detention home or other secure facility management projects;

Evidence of past performance of similar contracts; and

The ability to comply with all applicable federal and state constitutional standards; federal, state, and local laws; court orders; and standards for a detention home or other secure facility.

Contracts awarded under the provisions of this article, including contracts for the provision of juvenile correctional facilities or programs or for the lease or use of public lands or buildings for use in the operation of facilities, may be entered into for a period of up to thirty years, subject to the requirements for expenditure of funds by the local governing body or bodies.

No contract for juvenile correctional facilities or programs shall be entered into unless the following requirements are met:

No contract for correctional services shall be executed unless:

a.

The contractor provides audited financial statements for the previous five years or for each of the years the contractor has been in operation if fewer than five years, and provides other financial information as requested; and

b.

The contractor provides an adequate plan of indemnification, specifically including indemnity for civil rights claims. The indemnification plan shall be adequate to protect the county or city or combination of counties, cities, or towns established pursuant to §

16.1-315

and public officials from all claims and losses incurred as a result of the contract. Nothing herein is intended to deprive a contractor or the county or city or combination of counties, cities, or towns established pursuant to §

16.1-315

of the benefits of any law limiting exposure to liability or setting a limit on damages.

a.

The proposed contract has been reviewed and approved by the State Board;

b.

An appropriation for the services to be provided under the contract has been expressly approved as is otherwise provided by law;

c.

The juvenile correctional facilities or programs proposed by the contract are of at least the same quality as those routinely provided by a governmental agency to similarly situated children; and

d.

An evaluation of the proposed contract demonstrates a cost benefit to the county or city or combination of counties, cities, or towns established pursuant to §

16.1-315

when compared to alternative means of providing the services through governmental agencies.

History.

1991, c. 258; 1992, c. 652; 1995, cc. 696, 699.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1995, c. 696, cl. 2 provides: “That this act shall become effective January 1, 1996, if state funds are provided to carry out the purposes of the Virginia Juvenile Community Crime Control Act during the 1995 Session of the General Assembly.” These funds were provided pursuant to Acts 1995, c. 853, item 578.

The 1995 amendments.

The 1995 amendments by cc. 696 and 699 are identical, and substituted “§

16.1-309.4

” for “§

16.1-310

” at the end of subsection A. For effective date, see the Editor’s note.

§ 16.1-322.6.
Powers and duties not delegable to contractor.

No contract for juvenile correctional facilities or programs shall authorize, allow, or imply a delegation of authority or responsibility to a juvenile correctional facilities or programs contractor for any of the following:

Developing and implementing procedures for calculating a detainee’s release date;

Classifying detainees or placing detainees in less restrictive custody or more restrictive custody;

Transferring a detainee; however, the contractor may make written recommendations regarding the transfer of a detainee or detainees;

Formulating rules of detainee behavior, violations of which may subject detainees to sanctions; however, the contractor may propose such rules for review and adoption, rejection, or modification as otherwise provided by law or regulation; and

Disciplining detainees in any manner which requires a discretionary application of rules of detainee behavior or a discretionary imposition of a sanction for violations of such rules.

History.

1991, c. 258; 1992, c. 652.

§ 16.1-322.7.
State Board to promulgate regulations.

The State Board shall make, adopt, and promulgate regulations governing the following aspects of private management and operation of local or regional detention homes or other secure facilities:

The schedule for state reimbursement to the cities or counties or any combination thereof, as the case may be, for costs of construction;

The manner of state payment to the localities for the care and custody costs at the facility of children for whom the Commonwealth is required to provide funds. However, in no event shall the payment to the localities, when calculated on a per diem per child basis, exceed the total cost ordinarily paid by the Commonwealth to the locality for the care and custody expenses of such children, when calculated on a per diem per child basis;

Minimum standards for the construction, equipment, administration, and operation of the facilities; however, the standards must be at least as stringent as those established for other local or regional detention homes or other secure facilities;

Contingency plans for operation of a contractor-operated facility in the event of a termination of the contract;

The powers and duties of contractors’ personnel charged with the care and custody of detainees, including use of force and discipline;

Methods of monitoring a contractor-operated facility by an appropriate state or local governmental entity or entities;

Public access to a contractor-operated facility; and

Such other regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this article.

History.

1991, c. 258; 1992, c. 652.